Hawaii statutes.
§501-29 Land subject to mortgage or lease.
When an application is made subject to an existing recorded mortgage, or to a
recorded lease for a term exceeding one year, or when the registration is to be
made subject to such a mortgage or lease executed after the time of the
application and before the date of the transcription of the decree, the
applicant shall, if required by the court, file a certified copy of the
mortgage or lease, and shall cause the original, or, in the discretion of the
court, a certified copy thereof, to be presented for registration before a
decree of registration is entered. [L 1903, c 56, §27; RL 1925, §3216; RL 1935,
§5020; RL 1945, §12620; RL 1955, §342-21; HRS §501-29]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next